Massachusetts, session 194th, S2942.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the Department of 
Corrections shall establish a sick leave bank for Greg Pinkerton, an employee of the office. Any 
employee of the office may voluntarily contribute 1 or more sick, personal or vacation days to 
the sick leave bank for use by Greg Pinkerton. If Greg Pinkerton terminates employment with the 
office or requests to dissolve the sick leave bank, any remaining time in the sick leave bank shall 
be transferred to the extended illness leave bank. Sick leave bank days shall not be used for 
absences unrelated to the illness or disability that necessitated the establishment of the sick leave 
bank as determined by the office.